Illinois, session 104th, SB2015.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Ticket Sale and Resale Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1.5 and 2 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 414/1.5)  (was 720 ILCS 375/1.5)7    Sec. 1.5. Sale of tickets at more than face value 8prohibited; exceptions. 9    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b), (c), 10(d), (e), and (f-5) of this Section and in Section 4, it is 11unlawful for any person, persons, firm or corporation to sell 12tickets for baseball games, football games, hockey games, 13theatre entertainments, or any other amusement for a price 14more than the price printed upon the face of said ticket, and 15the price of said ticket shall correspond with the same price 16shown at the box office or the office of original 17distribution.18    (b) This Act does not apply to the resale of tickets of 19admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 20or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a 21price in excess of the printed box office ticket price by a 22ticket broker who meets all of the following requirements:23        (1) The ticket broker is duly registered with the   SB2015- 2 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1    Office of the Secretary of State on a registration form 2    provided by that Office. The registration must contain a 3    certification that the ticket broker:4            (A) engages in the resale of tickets on a regular 5        and ongoing basis from one or more permanent or fixed 6        locations located within this State;7            (B) maintains as the principal business activity 8        at those locations the resale of tickets;9            (C) displays at those locations the ticket 10        broker's registration;11            (D) maintains at those locations a listing of the 12        names and addresses of all persons employed by the 13        ticket broker;14            (E) is in compliance with all applicable federal, 15        State, and local laws relating to its ticket selling 16        activities, and that neither the ticket broker nor any 17        of its employees within the preceding 12 months have 18        been convicted of a violation of this Act; and19            (F) meets the following requirements:20                (i) the ticket broker maintains a toll free 21            number specifically dedicated for Illinois 22            consumer complaints and inquiries concerning 23            ticket sales;24                (ii) the ticket broker has adopted a code that 25            advocates consumer protection that includes, at a 26            minimum:  SB2015- 3 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1                    (a-1) consumer protection guidelines;2                    (b-1) a standard refund policy. In the 3                event a refund is due, the ticket broker shall 4                provide that refund without charge other than 5                for reasonable delivery fees for the return of 6                the tickets; and7                    (c-1) standards of professional conduct;8                (iii) the ticket broker has adopted a 9            procedure for the binding resolution of consumer 10            complaints by an independent, disinterested third 11            party and thereby submits to the jurisdiction of 12            the State of Illinois; and13                (iv) the ticket broker has established and 14            maintains a consumer protection rebate fund in 15            Illinois in an amount in excess of $100,000, which 16            must be cash available for immediate disbursement 17            for satisfaction of valid consumer complaints.18        Alternatively, the ticket broker may fulfill the 19    requirements of subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (1) if 20    the ticket broker certifies that he or she belongs to a 21    professional association organized under the laws of this 22    State, or organized under the laws of any other state and 23    authorized to conduct business in Illinois, that has been 24    in existence for at least 3 years prior to the date of that 25    broker's registration with the Office of the Secretary of 26    State, and is specifically dedicated, for and on behalf of   SB2015- 4 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1    its members, to provide and maintain the consumer 2    protection requirements of subparagraph (F) of this 3    paragraph (1) to maintain the integrity of the ticket 4    brokerage industry.5        (2) (Blank).6        (3) The ticket broker and his employees must not 7    engage in the practice of selling, or attempting to sell, 8    tickets for any event while sitting or standing near the 9    facility at which the event is to be held or is being held 10    unless the ticket broker or his or her employees are on 11    property they own, lease, or have permission to occupy.12        (4) The ticket broker must comply with all 13    requirements of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and 14    collect and remit all other applicable federal, State and 15    local taxes in connection with the ticket broker's ticket 16    selling activities.17        (5) Beginning January 1, 1996, no ticket broker shall 18    advertise for resale any tickets within this State unless 19    the advertisement contains the name of the ticket broker 20    and the Illinois registration number issued by the Office 21    of the Secretary of State under this Section.22        (6) Each ticket broker registered under this Act shall 23    pay an annual registration fee of $100.24    (c) This Act does not apply to the sale of tickets of 25admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 26or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a   SB2015- 5 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1price in excess of the printed box office ticket price by a 2reseller engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce on an 3Internet auction listing service duly registered with the 4Office of the Secretary of State on a registration form 5provided by that Office. This subsection (c) applies to both 6sales through an online bid submission process and sales at a 7fixed price on the same website or interactive computer 8service as an Internet auction listing service.9    This subsection (c) applies to resales described in this 10subsection only if the operator of the Internet auction 11listing service meets the following requirements:12        (1) the operator maintains a listing of the names and 13    addresses of its corporate officers;14        (2) the operator is in compliance with all applicable 15    federal, State, and local laws relating to ticket selling 16    activities, and the operator's officers and directors have 17    not been convicted of a violation of this Act within the 18    preceding 12 months; 19        (3) the operator maintains, either itself or through 20    an affiliate, a toll free number dedicated for consumer 21    complaints;22        (4) the operator provides consumer protections that 23    include at a minimum:24            (A) consumer protection guidelines;25            (B) a standard refund policy that guarantees to 26        all purchasers that it will provide and in fact   SB2015- 6 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1        provides a full refund of the amount paid by the 2        purchaser (including, but not limited to, all fees, 3        regardless of how characterized) if the following 4        occurs:5                (i) the ticketed event is cancelled and the 6            purchaser returns the tickets to the seller or 7            Internet auction listing service; however, 8            reasonable delivery fees need not be refunded if 9            the previously disclosed guarantee specifies that 10            the fees will not be refunded if the event is 11            cancelled;12                (ii) the ticket received by the purchaser does 13            not allow the purchaser to enter the ticketed 14            event for reasons that may include, without 15            limitation, that the ticket is counterfeit or that 16            the ticket has been cancelled by the issuer due to 17            non-payment, unless the ticket is cancelled due to 18            an act or omission by such purchaser;19                (iii) the ticket fails to conform to its 20            description on the Internet auction listing 21            service; or22                (iv) the ticket seller willfully fails to send 23            the ticket or tickets to the purchaser, or the 24            ticket seller attempted to deliver the ticket or 25            tickets to the purchaser in the manner required by 26            the Internet auction listing service and the   SB2015- 7 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1            purchaser failed to receive the ticket or tickets; 2            and 3            (C) standards of professional conduct; 4        (5) the operator has adopted an independent and 5    disinterested dispute resolution procedure that allows 6    resellers or purchasers to file complaints against the 7    other and have those complaints mediated or resolved by a 8    third party, and requires the resellers or purchasers to 9    submit to the jurisdiction of the State of Illinois for 10    complaints involving a ticketed event held in Illinois;11        (6) the operator either:12            (A) complies with all applicable requirements of 13        the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and collects and 14        remits all applicable federal, State, and local taxes; 15        or 16            (B) publishes a written notice on the website 17        after the sale of one or more tickets that 18        automatically informs the ticket reseller of the 19        ticket reseller's potential legal obligation to pay 20        any applicable local amusement tax in connection with 21        the reseller's sale of tickets, and discloses to law 22        enforcement or other government tax officials, without 23        subpoena, the name, city, state, telephone number, 24        e-mail address, user ID history, fraud complaints, and 25        bidding and listing history of any specifically 26        identified reseller or purchaser upon the receipt of a   SB2015- 8 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1        verified request from law enforcement or other 2        government tax officials relating to a criminal 3        investigation or alleged illegal activity; and 4        (7) the operator either:5            (A) has established and maintains a consumer 6        protection rebate fund in Illinois in an amount in 7        excess of $100,000, which must be cash available for 8        immediate disbursement for satisfaction of valid 9        consumer complaints; or10            (B) has obtained and maintains in force an errors 11        and omissions insurance policy that provides at least 12        $100,000 in coverage. 13    (d) This Act does not apply to the resale of tickets of 14admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 15or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a 16price in excess of the printed box office ticket price 17conducted at an auction solely by or for a not-for-profit 18organization for charitable purposes under clause (a)(1) of 19Section 10-1 of the Auction License Act.20    (e) This Act does not apply to the resale of a ticket for 21admission to a baseball game, football game, hockey game, 22theatre entertainment, or any other amusement for a price more 23than the price printed on the face of the ticket and for more 24than the price of the ticket at the box office if the resale is 25made through an Internet website whose operator meets the 26following requirements:  SB2015- 9 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1        (1) the operator has a business presence and physical 2    street address in the State of Illinois and clearly and 3    conspicuously posts that address on the website;4        (2) the operator maintains a listing of the names of 5    the operator's directors and officers, and is duly 6    registered with the Office of the Secretary of State on a 7    registration form provided by that Office; 8        (3) the operator is in compliance with all applicable 9    federal, State, and local laws relating to its ticket 10    reselling activities regulated under this Act, and the 11    operator's officers and directors have not been convicted 12    of a violation of this Act within the preceding 12 months; 13        (4) the operator maintains a toll free number 14    specifically dedicated for consumer complaints and 15    inquiries regarding ticket resales made through the 16    website;17        (5) the operator either:18            (A) has established and maintains a consumer 19        protection rebate fund in Illinois in an amount in 20        excess of $100,000, which must be cash available for 21        immediate disbursement for satisfaction of valid 22        consumer complaints; or23            (B) has obtained and maintains in force an errors 24        and omissions policy of insurance in the minimum 25        amount of $100,000 for the satisfaction of valid 26        consumer complaints;  SB2015- 10 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1        (6) the operator has adopted an independent and 2    disinterested dispute resolution procedure that allows 3    resellers or purchasers to file complaints against the 4    other and have those complaints mediated or resolved by a 5    third party, and requires the resellers or purchasers to 6    submit to the jurisdiction of the State of Illinois for 7    complaints involving a ticketed event held in Illinois;8        (7) the operator either:9            (A) complies with all applicable requirements of 10        the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and collects and 11        remits all applicable federal, State, and local taxes; 12        or13            (B) publishes a written notice on the website 14        after the sale of one or more tickets that 15        automatically informs the ticket reseller of the 16        ticket reseller's potential legal obligation to pay 17        any applicable local amusement tax in connection with 18        the reseller's sale of tickets, and discloses to law 19        enforcement or other government tax officials, without 20        subpoena, the name, city, state, telephone number, 21        e-mail address, user ID history, fraud complaints, and 22        bidding and listing history of any specifically 23        identified reseller or purchaser upon the receipt of a 24        verified request from law enforcement or other 25        government tax officials relating to a criminal 26        investigation or alleged illegal activity; and   SB2015- 11 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1        (8) the operator guarantees to all purchasers that it 2    will provide and in fact provides a full refund of the 3    amount paid by the purchaser (including, but not limited 4    to, all fees, regardless of how characterized) if any of 5    the following occurs:6            (A) the ticketed event is cancelled and the 7        purchaser returns the tickets to the website operator; 8        however, reasonable delivery fees need not be refunded 9        if the previously disclosed guarantee specifies that 10        the fees will not be refunded if the event is 11        cancelled;12            (B) the ticket received by the purchaser does not 13        allow the purchaser to enter the ticketed event for 14        reasons that may include, without limitation, that the 15        ticket is counterfeit or that the ticket has been 16        cancelled by the issuer due to non-payment, unless the 17        ticket is cancelled due to an act or omission by the 18        purchaser;19            (C) the ticket fails to conform to its description 20        on the website; or21            (D) the ticket seller willfully fails to send the 22        ticket or tickets to the purchaser, or the ticket 23        seller attempted to deliver the ticket or tickets to 24        the purchaser in the manner required by the website 25        operator and the purchaser failed to receive the 26        ticket or tickets.   SB2015- 12 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1    Nothing in this subsection (e) shall be deemed to imply 2any limitation on ticket sales made in accordance with 3subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Section or any 4limitation on sales made in accordance with Section 4. 5    (f) The provisions of subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e) 6of this Section apply only to the resale of a ticket after the 7initial sale of that ticket. No reseller of a ticket may refuse 8to sell tickets to another ticket reseller solely on the basis 9that the purchaser is a ticket reseller or ticket broker 10authorized to resell tickets pursuant to this Act. 11    (f-5) In addition to the requirements imposed under 12subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this Section, 13ticket brokers and resellers must comply with the requirements 14of this subsection. Before accepting any payment from a 15purchaser, a ticket broker or reseller must disclose to the 16purchaser in a clear, conspicuous, and readily noticeable 17manner the following information: 18        (1) the registered name and city of the event venue;19        (2) that the ticket broker or reseller is not the 20    event venue box office or its licensed ticket agent, but 21    is, instead, a ticket broker or reseller and that lost or 22    stolen tickets may be reissued only by ticket brokers or 23    resellers;24        (3) whether it is registered under this Act; and25        (4) its refund policy, name, and contact information. 26    Before selling and accepting payment for a ticket, a   SB2015- 13 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1ticket broker or reseller must require the purchaser to 2acknowledge by an affirmative act the disclosures required 3under this subsection. The disclosures required by this 4subsection must be made in a clear and conspicuous manner, 5appear together, and be preceded by the heading "IMPORTANT 6NOTICE" which must be in bold face font that is larger than the 7font size of the required disclosures.8    Ticket brokers and resellers must guarantee a full refund 9of the amount paid by the purchaser, including handling and 10delivery fees, if any of the following occurs:11        (1) the ticket received by the purchaser does not 12    grant the purchaser admission to the event described on 13    the ticket, unless it is due to an act or omission by the 14    purchaser;15        (2) the ticket fails to conform substantially to its 16    description as advertised; or17        (3) the event for which the ticket has been resold is 18    cancelled and not rescheduled. 19    This subsection (f-5) does not apply to an Internet 20auction listing service.21    (f-10) A person or entity that does not have actual or 22constructive possession of an event ticket shall not sell, 23offer for sale, or advertise for sale the event ticket. 24Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit any person or entity 25from offering a service to a consumer to obtain an event ticket 26on behalf of the consumer, if the person or entity complies   SB2015- 14 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1with the following:2        (1) does not market or list the service as an event 3    ticket;4        (2) displays the total price for the service at the 5    time the service is first listed for sale, which includes 6    all applicable required fees (excluding taxes or any fees 7    assessed for the physical delivery of tickets), in any 8    advertisement, marketing, price list, social media 9    promotion, or other interface where a price is displayed 10    for the service, including at the time it is first 11    displayed to the individual and anytime throughout the 12    purchasing process;13        (3) clearly and conspicuously discloses, prior to 14    selection of the service, that the service is not an event 15    ticket and that the purchase of the service does not 16    guarantee a ticket to the event; and17        (4) does not obtain more tickets in each transaction 18    than the numerical limitations for tickets set by the 19    venue and artist for each respective event.20    If the person or entity is unable to obtain the specified 21event ticket for the consumer, the person or entity shall 22provide the consumer, within a reasonable amount of time, with 23a full refund for the total cost of the service to obtain the 24ticket, including any fees or taxes, or, subject to 25availability, a replacement event ticket in the same or a 26comparable location with the approval of the consumer.  SB2015- 15 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1    (f-15) A ticket issuer, ticket broker, or ticket resale 2marketplace shall not offer for sale an event ticket unless 3the ticket issuer, ticket broker, or ticket resale 4marketplace:5        (1) clearly and conspicuously:6            (A) displays the total event ticket price at the 7        time the ticket is first listed for sale in any 8        advertisement, marketing, price list, social media 9        promotion, or other interface where a price is 10        displayed for the event ticket; and11            (B) discloses to a consumer who seeks to purchase 12        an event ticket:13                (i) the total event ticket price at the time 14            the ticket is first displayed to the individual 15            and anytime throughout the ticket purchasing 16            process, and, prior to checkout, shall include an 17            itemized breakdown of the base event ticket price 18            of the event ticket and all applicable event 19            ticket fees and taxes;20                (ii) the space within the venue that the event 21            ticket entitles the bearer to occupy for the 22            event, whether that is general admission or a 23            specific row or section;24                (iii) the refund policies and how to obtain a 25            refund, including under what circumstances a full 26            refund will be issued and how to obtain a full   SB2015- 16 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1            refund of the total event ticket price and taxes;2                (iv) the estimated date and means of delivery 3            for the event ticket; and4                (v) a link to the full terms and conditions 5            applied by the ticket issuer, ticket broker, or 6            ticket resale marketplace of the event ticket to 7            any individual who seeks to purchase an event 8            ticket prior to purchase.9    If the event ticket is an electronic ticket, the ticket 10issuer, ticket broker, or ticket resale marketplace shall 11deliver written proof of purchase to the purchaser as soon as 12is practicable, and no later than 24 hours, after the purchase 13of the event ticket. The written proof of purchase shall 14include the disclosures required under subparagraph (B).15    (f-20) As used in this Section:16    "Base event ticket price" means the price for the sale of 17the event ticket, exclusive of any taxes or event ticket fees.18    "Event ticket fee" means a charge that must be paid in 19addition to the base event ticket price in order to obtain an 20event ticket from a ticket issuer, secondary market ticket 21issuer, or secondary market ticket exchange, seller, or 22reseller, including any service fee, charge and order 23processing fee, facility charge fee, and any other charge. 24"Event ticket fee" does not include any charge or fee for an 25optional product or service associated with the event that may 26be selected by a purchaser of an event ticket or fees to send   SB2015- 17 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1physical tickets to a consumer through the mail, including 2private mail services.3    "Optional product or service" means a product or service 4that an individual does not need to purchase to use or take 5possession of an event ticket.6    "Ticket broker" means any person, including a ticket 7issuer, that resells or makes a secondary sale of an event 8ticket to the general public in the regular course of the trade 9or business of the person.10    "Ticket issuer" means any person who makes event tickets 11available, directly or indirectly, to the general public, and 12may include:13        (1) the operator of the venue;14        (2) the sponsor or promoter of an event;15        (3) a sports team participating in an event or a 16    league whose teams are participating in an event;17        (4) a theater company, musical group, or similar 18    participant in an event; and19        (5) an agent for any such person.20    "Ticket resale marketplace" means a person that operates a 21platform or exchange for the resale of tickets between third 22parties or between the ticket resale marketplace and a third 23party. "Ticket resale marketplace" includes a ticket issuer 24only to the extent the ticket issuer is acting to facilitate 25the resale of tickets between third parties or between the 26ticket issuer, acting as a ticket resale marketplace, and a   SB2015- 18 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1third party.2    "Total event ticket price" means the total cost of the 3event ticket, including the base event ticket price and any 4event ticket fees but excluding taxes.5    (g) The provisions of Public Act 89-406 are severable 6under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.7    (h) The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 94th 8General Assembly are severable under Section 1.31 of the 9Statute on Statutes. 10(Source: P.A. 99-431, eff. 1-1-16; 100-534, eff. 9-22-17.) 11    (815 ILCS 414/2)  (was 720 ILCS 375/2)12    Sec. 2. (a) Whoever violates any of the provisions of 13Section 1.5 of this Act, except for subsections (f-10), 14(f-15), and (f-20) of Section 1.5, shall be guilty of a Class A 15misdemeanor and may be fined up to $5,000 $5,000.00 for each 16offense, whoever violates subsections (f-10), (f-15), and 17(f-20) of Section 1.5 may be fined up to $5,000 for each 18offense, and whoever violates any other provision of this Act 19may be enjoined and be required to make restitution to all 20injured consumers upon application for injunctive relief by 21the State's Attorney or Attorney General and shall also be 22guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, and any owner, lessee, 23manager or trustee convicted under this Act shall, in addition 24to the penalty herein provided, forfeit the license of such 25theatre, circus, baseball park, or place of public   SB2015- 19 -LRB104 10435 SPS 20510 b1entertainment or amusement so granted and the same shall be 2revoked by the authorities granting the same.3    (b) Tickets sold or offered for sale by a person, firm or 4corporation in violation of Section 1.5 of this Act may be 5confiscated by a court on motion of the Attorney General, a 6State's Attorney, the sponsor of the event for which the 7tickets are being sold, or the owner or operator of the 8facility at which the event is to be held, and may be donated 9by order of the court to an appropriate organization as 10defined under Section 2 of the Charitable Games Act.11    (c) The Attorney General, a State's Attorney, the sponsor 12of an event for which tickets are being sold, or the owner or 13operator of the facility at which an event is to be held may 14seek an injunction restraining any person, firm or corporation 15from selling or offering for sale tickets in violation of the 16provisions of this Act. In addition, on motion of the Attorney 17General, a State's Attorney, the sponsor of an event for which 18tickets are being sold, or the owner or operator of the 19facility at which an event is to be held, a court may 20permanently enjoin a person, firm or corporation found guilty 21of violating Section 1.5 of this Act from engaging in the offer 22or sale of tickets.23(Source: P.A. 99-78, eff. 7-20-15.)